Mississippi, session 2026, HB251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Any person who, while engaged in any type of employment, and is subject to unwanted sexual advances, requests for sexual favors or other physical conduct of a sexual nature that is prohibited by federal law, shall have a cause of action in the courts of this state for such sexual harassment.  Such person shall be entitled to all civil remedies including damages for such sexual harassment. (2)  The cause of action created by this section shall not be waived by any contract or agreement as a condition of employment. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.